Georgia, session 2025_26, HB489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "End Public Funding of Misinformation
Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Department
of Public Health, is amended by repealing and reserving Article 2, relating to positive
alternatives for pregnancy and parenting grant program, in its entirety.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 489
- 1 -